District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-936

Dissolution; methods; vote required for approval; distribution of assets.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 489, ch. 397, § 36
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-936.
1981 Ed., § 29-1136.
1973 Ed., § 29-836.